Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-191.03
Prohibited acts; violations; penalties.

(1) A loan broker who fails to make accurate and timely filings as required by section 45-191.02 shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(2) A loan broker who willfully violates subdivision (1) of section 45-191 shall be guilty of:

(a) A Class IV felony if the advance fee assessed or collected is greater than three hundred dollars; or

(b) A Class I misdemeanor if the advance fee assessed or collected is three hundred dollars or less.

(3) A willful violation of any other provision of sections 45-189 to 45-191.11 by a loan broker shall be a Class IV felony.

Laws 1993, LB 270, § 5.